North Carolina statutes. Chapter 148. State Prison System.
Article 2. Prison Regulations.
§ 148-23.
Prison employees not to use intoxicants, narcotic drugs or profanity. [Effective January 1, 2023]

No one addicted to the use of alcoholic beverages, or narcotic drugs, shall be employed as superintendent, warden, guard, or in any other position connected with the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, where such position requires the incumbent to have any charge or direction of the prisoners; and anyone holding such position, or anyone who may be employed in any other capacity in the State prison system, who shall come under the influence of alcoholic beverages during hours of employment, or reports for duty under the effect of intoxicants, or narcotic drugs, or who shall become intoxicated, or uses narcotic drugs, under circumstances that bring discredit on the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction, shall be subject to immediate dismissal from employment by any of the institutions and shall not be eligible for reinstatement to such position or be employed in any other position in any of the institutions. Any superintendent, warden, correctional officer, supervisor, or other person holding any position in the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction who curses a prisoner under his charge shall be subject to immediate dismissal from employment and shall not be eligible for reinstatement.

History.

1917, c. 286, s. 16; 1919, c. 80, s. 8; C.S., s. 7733; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1957, c. 349, s. 10; 1967, c. 996, s. 13; 1969, c. 382; 1981, c. 412, s. 4(4); c. 747, s. 66; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2012-83, s. 61; 2016-77, s. 8(c); 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnn); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-23

.

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-77, s. 8(c), effective July 1, 2016, substituted “correctional officer” for “guard” in the last sentence.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(nnnnnnn), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” throughout the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” throughout the section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-23.1.
Tobacco products prohibited on State correctional facilities premises. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The General Assembly finds that in order to protect the health, welfare, and comfort of inmates in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and to reduce the costs of inmate health care, it is necessary to prohibit inmates from using tobacco products on the premises of State correctional facilities and to ensure that employees and visitors do not use tobacco products on the premises of those facilities.

No person may use tobacco products on the premises of a State correctional facility, except for authorized religious purposes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, inmates in the custody of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and persons facilitating religious observances may use and possess tobacco products for religious purposes consistent with the policies of the Division.

(b1)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person may possess tobacco products on the premises of a State correctional facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, an employee or visitor may possess tobacco products within the confines of a motor vehicle located in a designated parking area of a correctional facility’s premises if the tobacco product remains in the vehicle and the vehicle is locked when the employee or visitor has exited the vehicle.

The Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section. Inmates in violation of this section are subject to disciplinary measures to be determined by the Division, including the potential loss of sentence credits earned prior to that violation. Employees in violation of this section are subject to disciplinary action by the Division. Visitors in violation of this section are subject to removal from the facility and loss of visitation privileges.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

State correctional facility. — All buildings and grounds of a State correctional institution operated by the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety.

Tobacco products. — Cigars, cigarettes, snuff, loose tobacco, or similar goods made with any part of the tobacco plant that are prepared or used for smoking, chewing, dipping, or other personal use. The term includes vapor products.

Vapor products. — Nonlighted, noncombustible products that employ a mechanical heating element, battery, or electronic circuit regardless of shape or size and that can be used to heat a liquid nicotine solution contained in a vapor cartridge. The term includes electronic cigarettes, electronic cigars, electronic cigarillos, and electronic pipes. The term does not include any product regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

History.

2005-372, s. 2; 2009-560, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2014-3, s. 15.2(a); 2017-186, s. 2(ooooooo).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-23.1

.

§ 148-23.1.
Tobacco products prohibited on State correctional facilities premises. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The General Assembly finds that in order to protect the health, welfare, and comfort of inmates in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and to reduce the costs of inmate health care, it is necessary to prohibit inmates from using tobacco products on the premises of State correctional facilities and to ensure that employees and visitors do not use tobacco products on the premises of those facilities.

No person may use tobacco products on the premises of a State correctional facility, except for authorized religious purposes. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, inmates in the custody of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and persons facilitating religious observances may use and possess tobacco products for religious purposes consistent with the policies of the Division.

(b1)

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, no person may possess tobacco products on the premises of a State correctional facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, an employee or visitor may possess tobacco products within the confines of a motor vehicle located in a designated parking area of a correctional facility’s premises if the tobacco product remains in the vehicle and the vehicle is locked when the employee or visitor has exited the vehicle.

The Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section. Inmates in violation of this section are subject to disciplinary measures to be determined by the Division, including the potential loss of sentence credits earned prior to that violation. Employees in violation of this section are subject to disciplinary action by the Division. Visitors in violation of this section are subject to removal from the facility and loss of visitation privileges.

As used in this section, the following terms mean:

State correctional facility. — All buildings and grounds of a State correctional institution operated by the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction.

Tobacco products. — Cigars, cigarettes, snuff, loose tobacco, or similar goods made with any part of the tobacco plant that are prepared or used for smoking, chewing, dipping, or other personal use. The term includes vapor products.

Vapor products. — Nonlighted, noncombustible products that employ a mechanical heating element, battery, or electronic circuit regardless of shape or size and that can be used to heat a liquid nicotine solution contained in a vapor cartridge. The term includes electronic cigarettes, electronic cigars, electronic cigarillos, and electronic pipes. The term does not include any product regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration under Chapter V of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

History.

2005-372, s. 2; 2009-560, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2014-3, s. 15.2(a); 2017-186, s. 2(ooooooo); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-23.1

.

§ 148-23.2.
Mobile phones prohibited on State correctional facilities premises. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Except as authorized by Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety policy, no person shall possess a mobile telephone or other wireless communications device on the premises of a State correctional facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an employee or visitor may possess a mobile telephone or other wireless communications device within the confines of a motor vehicle located in a designated parking area of a correctional facility’s premises if the mobile telephone or other wireless communications device remains in the vehicle and the vehicle is locked when the employee or visitor has exited the vehicle.

History.

2009-560, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppppp).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 148-23.2

.

Cross References.

As to furnishing tobacco products or mobile phones to inmates, see

G.S. 14-258.1

.

§ 148-23.2.
Mobile phones prohibited on State correctional facilities premises. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Except as authorized by Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction policy, no person shall possess a mobile telephone or other wireless communications device on the premises of a State correctional facility. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, an employee or visitor may possess a mobile telephone or other wireless communications device within the confines of a motor vehicle located in a designated parking area of a correctional facility’s premises if the mobile telephone or other wireless communications device remains in the vehicle and the vehicle is locked when the employee or visitor has exited the vehicle.

History.

2009-560, s. 2; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2017-186, s. 2(ppppppp); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(p).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 148-23.2

.

Cross References.

As to furnishing tobacco products or mobile phones to inmates, see

G.S. 14-258.1

.

§ 148-24.
Religious services. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The general policies, rules and regulations of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety shall provide for religious services to be held in all units of the State prison system on Sunday and at such other times as may be deemed appropriate. Attendance of prisoners at religious services shall be voluntary. The Secretary of Public Safety shall if possible secure the visits of some minister at the prison hospitals to administer to the spiritual wants of the sick.

History.

1873-4, c. 158, s. 18; 1883, c. 349; Code, s. 3446; Rev., s. 5405; 1915, c. 125, ss. 1, 2; 1917, c. 286, s. 15; C.S., s. 7735; 1925, c. 163; c. 275, s. 6; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1967, c. 996, s. 6; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqq).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-24.
Religious services. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The general policies, rules and regulations of the Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction shall provide for religious services to be held in all units of the State prison system on Sunday and at such other times as may be deemed appropriate. Attendance of prisoners at religious services shall be voluntary. The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction shall if possible secure the visits of some minister at the prison hospitals to administer to the spiritual wants of the sick.

History.

1873-4, c. 158, s. 18; 1883, c. 349; Code, s. 3446; Rev., s. 5405; 1915, c. 125, ss. 1, 2; 1917, c. 286, s. 15; C.S., s. 7735; 1925, c. 163; c. 275, s. 6; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1967, c. 996, s. 6; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h), (i); 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqq); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(qqqqqqq), effective December 1, 2017, inserted “and Juvenile Justice” in the first sentence of the section.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), (p), substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” in the first sentence and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” in the last sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-25.
Secretary to investigate death of convicts. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of Public Safety, upon information of the death of a convict other than by natural causes, shall investigate the cause thereof and report the result of such investigation to the Governor, and for this purpose the Secretary may administer oaths and send for persons and papers.

History.

1885, c. 379, s. 2; Rev., s. 5409; C.S., s. 7746; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” at the beginning of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 148-25.
Secretary to investigate death of convicts. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction, upon information of the death of a convict other than by natural causes, shall investigate the cause thereof and report the result of such investigation to the Governor, and for this purpose the Secretary may administer oaths and send for persons and papers.

History.

1885, c. 379, s. 2; Rev., s. 5409; C.S., s. 7746; 1925, c. 163; 1933, c. 172, s. 18; 1955, c. 238, s. 9; 1967, c. 996, s. 15; 1973, c. 1262, s. 10; 2011-145, s. 19.1(i); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(o), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Adult Correction” for “Secretary of Public Safety” at the beginning of this section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.